Missouri, session 2026, HB3269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.990, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 192.990, to read as follows:
192.990. 1. There is hereby established within the department of health and senior
services the "Pregnancy-Associated Mortality Review Board" to improve data collection and
reporting with respect to maternal deaths. The department may collaborate with localities and
with other states to meet the goals of the initiative.
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of health and senior services;
(2) "Maternal death", the death of a woman while pregnant or during the one-year
period following the date of the end of pregnancy, regardless of the cause of death and
regardless of whether a delivery, miscarriage, or death occurs inside or outside of a hospital;
(3) "Maternity care deserts", counties in which access to maternity care services
is limited or absent, either through a lack of services or through barriers to a woman's
ability to access care within a county. A "maternity care desert" shall include, but not
be limited to, any county without a hospital or birth center offering obstetric care and
without any obstetric clinicians.
3. The board shall be composed of no more than [eighteen] twenty-two members,
with a chair elected from among its membership. The board shall meet at least twice per year
and shall approve the strategic priorities, funding allocations, work processes, and products of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3269 2
the board. Members of the board shall be appointed by the director of the department.
Members shall serve four-year terms, except that the initial terms shall be staggered so that
approximately one-third serve three-, four-, and five-year terms.
4. The board shall have a multidisciplinary and diverse membership that represents a
variety of medical and nursing specialties, including, but not limited to, obstetrics and
maternal-fetal care, as well as state or local public health officials, epidemiologists,
statisticians, community organizations, geographic regions, and other individuals or
organizations that are most affected by maternal deaths and lack of access to maternal
health care services. At least one member from each congressional district shall be
selected to serve on the board and membership shall be demographically diverse,
including by race, ethnicity, sex, age, and rural and urban populations.
5. The duties of the board shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Conducting ongoing comprehensive, multidisciplinary reviews of all maternal
deaths;
(2) Identifying factors associated with maternal deaths;
(3) Identifying maternity care deserts throughout the state;
(4) Reviewing medical records and other relevant data, which shall include, to the
extent available:
(a) A description of the maternal deaths determined by matching each death record of
a maternal death to a birth certificate of an infant or fetal death record, as applicable, and an
indication of whether the delivery, miscarriage, or death occurred inside or outside of a
hospital;
(b) Data collected from medical examiner and coroner reports, as appropriate; [and]
(c) The level and timing of prenatal and postnatal medical care; and
(d) Using other appropriate methods or information to identify maternal deaths,
including deaths from pregnancy outcomes not identified under paragraph (a) of this
subdivision;
[(4)] (5) Consulting with relevant experts, as needed;
[(5)] (6) Analyzing cases to produce recommendations for reducing maternal
mortality;
[(6)] (7) Disseminating recommendations to policy makers, health care providers and
facilities, and the general public;
[(7)] (8) Recommending and promoting preventative strategies and making
recommendations for systems changes;
[(8)] (9) Protecting the confidentiality of the hospitals and individuals involved in any
maternal deaths;
[(9)] (10) Examining racial and social disparities in maternal deaths;

HB 3269 3
(11) Investigating and developing recommendations regarding approaches taken
in other states or other organizations to reduce or eliminate racial inequities in maternal
deaths, including community-driven strategies, health care accessibility, insurance
availability, and other barriers to access and delivery of prenatal and postpartum care;
[(10)] (12) Subject to appropriation, providing for voluntary and confidential case
reporting of maternal deaths to the appropriate state health agency by family members of the
deceased, and other appropriate individuals, for purposes of review by the board;
[(11)] (13) Making publicly available the contact information of the board for use in
such reporting;
[(12)] (14) Conducting outreach to local professional organizations, community
organizations, and social services agencies regarding the availability of the review board;
[and]
(15) Examining and developing recommendations on the adequacy of data
collected under this section and if additional categories of data would be informative in
the study of maternal deaths in Missouri; and
[(13)] (16) Ensuring that data collected under this section is made available, as
appropriate and practicable, for research purposes, in a manner that protects individually
identifiable or potentially identifiable information and that is consistent with state and federal
privacy laws.
6. The board may contract with other entities consistent with the duties of the board.
7. (1) Before June 30, 2020, and annually thereafter, the board shall submit to the
Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the director of the department, the
governor, and the general assembly a report on maternal mortality in the state based on data
collected through ongoing comprehensive, multidisciplinary reviews of all maternal deaths,
and any other projects or efforts funded by the board. The data shall be collected using best
practices to reliably determine and include all maternal deaths, regardless of the outcome of
the pregnancy and shall include data, findings, and recommendations of the committee, and,
as applicable, information on the implementation during such year of any recommendations
submitted by the board in a previous year. Data reported by the board shall be
disaggregated by race, ethnicity, language, nationality, age, zip code, the presence or
absence of maternity care deserts, and level and timing of prenatal and postnatal care in
a manner that protects individually identifiable or potentially identifiable information
and that is consistent with state and federal privacy laws.
(2) The report shall be made available to the public on the department's website and
the director shall disseminate the report to all health care providers and facilities that provide
women's health services in the state.

HB 3269 4
8. The director of the department, or his or her designee, shall provide the board with
the copy of the death certificate and any linked birth or fetal death certificate for any maternal
death occurring within the state.
9. Upon request by the department, health care providers, health care facilities,
clinics, laboratories, medical examiners, coroners, law enforcement agencies, driver's license
bureaus, other state agencies, and facilities licensed by the department shall provide to the
department data related to maternal deaths from sources such as medical records, autopsy
reports, medical examiner's reports, coroner's reports, law enforcement reports, motor vehicle
records, social services records, and other sources as appropriate. Such data requests shall be
100 limited to maternal deaths which have occurred within the previous twenty-four months. No
101 entity shall be held liable for civil damages or be subject to any criminal or disciplinary action
102 when complying in good faith with a request from the department for information under the
103 provisions of this subsection.
104 10. (1) The board shall protect the privacy and confidentiality of all patients,
105 decedents, providers, hospitals, or any other participants involved in any maternal deaths. In
106 no case shall any individually identifiable health information be provided to the public or
107 submitted to an information clearinghouse.
108 (2) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the board or department from publishing
109 statistical compilations and research reports that:
110 (a) Are based on confidential information relating to mortality reviews under this
111 section; and
112 (b) Do not contain identifying information or any other information that could be
113 used to ultimately identify the individuals concerned.
114 (3) Information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data
115 collected under this section shall not be admissible as evidence in any action of any kind in
116 any court or before any other tribunal, board, agency, or person. Such information, records,
117 reports, notes, memoranda, data obtained by the department or any other person, statements,
118 notes, memoranda, or other data shall not be exhibited nor their contents disclosed in any
119 way, in whole or in part, by any officer or representative of the department or any other
120 person. No person participating in such review shall disclose, in any manner, the information
121 so obtained except in strict conformity with such review project. Such information shall not
122 be subject to disclosure under chapter 610.
123 (4) All information, records of interviews, written reports, statements, notes,
124 memoranda, or other data obtained by the department, the board, and other persons, agencies,
125 or organizations so authorized by the department under this section shall be confidential.
126 (5) All proceedings and activities of the board, opinions of members of such board
127 formed as a result of such proceedings and activities, and records obtained, created, or

HB 3269 5
128 maintained under this section, including records of interviews, written reports, statements,
129 notes, memoranda, or other data obtained by the department or any other person, agency, or
130 organization acting jointly or under contract with the department in connection with the
131 requirements of this section, shall be confidential and shall not be subject to subpoena,
132 discovery, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding; provided,
133 however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the right to discover
134 or use in any civil or criminal proceeding anything that is available from another source and
135 entirely independent of the board's proceedings.
136 (6) Members of the board shall not be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding
137 regarding the information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a meeting or
138 communication of the board; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be
139 construed to prevent a member of the board from testifying to information obtained
140 independently of the board or which is public information.
141 11. The department may use grant program funds to support the efforts of the board
142 and may apply for additional federal government and private foundation grants as needed.
143 The department may also accept private, foundation, city, county, or federal moneys to
144 implement the provisions of this section.
✔